Illinois, session 104th, SB1452.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 534-4 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/34-4)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-4)7    Sec. 34-4. Eligibility. To be eligible for election or 8appointment to the Board, a person shall be a citizen of the 9United States, shall be a registered voter as provided in the 10Election Code, shall have been, for a period of one year 11immediately before election or appointment, a resident of the 12city, district, and subdistrict that the member represents, 13and shall not be a child sex offender as defined in Section 1411-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012. A person is ineligible for 15election or appointment to the Board if that person is not in 16compliance with the provisions of Section 10-9 as referenced 17in Section 34-3. For the 2024 general election, all persons 18eligible for election to the Board shall be nominated by a 19petition signed by at least 1,000 but not more than 3,000 of 20the voters residing within the electoral district on a 21petition in order to be placed on the ballot. For the 2026 22general election and general elections thereafter, persons 23eligible for election to the Board shall be nominated by a   SB1452- 2 -LRB104 09727 LNS 19793 b1petition signed by at least 500 but no more than 1,500 voters 2residing within the subdistrict on a petition in order to be 3placed on the ballot, except that persons eligible for 4election to the Board at large shall be nominated by a petition 5signed by no less than 2,500 voters residing within the city. 6Any registered voter may sign a nominating petition, 7irrespective of any partisan petition the voter signs or may 8sign. For the 2024 general election only, the petition 9circulation period shall begin on March 26, 2024, and the 10filing period shall be from June 17, 2024 to June 24, 2024. 11Permanent removal from the city by any member of the Board 12during the member's term of office constitutes a resignation 13therefrom and creates a vacancy in the Board. The Board may, by 14resolution, provide for the compensation of Board members. The 15compensation provided for Board members may include, but is 16not limited to, reimbursement Board members shall serve 17without any compensation; however, members of the Board shall 18be reimbursed for expenses incurred while in the performance 19of their duties upon submission of proper receipts or upon 20submission of a signed voucher in the case of an expense 21allowance evidencing the amount of such reimbursement or 22allowance to the President of the Board for verification and 23approval. Board members shall not hold other public office 24under the Federal, State or any local government other than 25that of Director of the Regional Transportation Authority, 26member of the economic development commission of a city having   SB1452- 3 -LRB104 09727 LNS 19793 b1a population exceeding 500,000, notary public or member of the 2National Guard, and by accepting any such office while members 3of the Board, or by not resigning any such office held at the 4time of being elected or appointed to the Board within 30 days 5after such election or appointment, shall be deemed to have 6vacated their membership in the Board.7(Source: P.A. 102-177, eff. 6-1-22; 102-691, eff. 12-17-21; 8103-584, eff. 3-18-24.)